Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-108
Boyd.

The county of Boyd is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point in the middle of the main channel of the Niobrara River intersected by the range line between eight and nine west; thence north on said range line to the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River; thence up the main channel of said river to a point intersected by forty-third north parallel; thence west on said parallel to a point intersected by the range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen; thence south on said line to a point in the middle of the main channel of the Niobrara River; thence down the main channel of said river to the place of beginning.

Laws 1891, c. 20, § 2, p. 224;

R.S.1913, § 821;

C.S.1922, § 723;

C.S.1929, § 25-110;

R.S.1943, § 22-108.